Maine, session 132, LD1109.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1060 is enacted to read:
§1060. Large-capacity ammunition feeding devices
1. A person is guilty of possession of a large-capacity ammunition feeding device if
that person knowingly manufactures, imports, purchases, possesses, sells, offers or
transfers ownership of a large-capacity ammunition feeding device.
2. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
A. "Large-capacity ammunition feeding device" means a magazine, belt, drum, box,
tube, feed strip or similar device that has a capacity of, or that can be readily restored
or converted to accept, more than 10 rounds of ammunition.
B. "Federally licensed firearm dealer" means a person or firm that is licensed or is
required to be licensed as a dealer under 18 United States Code, Section 923(a).
3. A person who violates subsection 1 commits a Class D crime.
4. This section does not apply to:
A. A person who, on the effective date of this section, lawfully possesses a large-
capacity ammunition feeding device as long as within 180 days of the effective date of
this section the person:
(1) Permanently modifies the large-capacity ammunition feeding device so that it
cannot hold more than 10 rounds of ammunition;
(2) Surrenders the large-capacity ammunition feeding device to the appropriate
law enforcement agency designated by the Department of Public Safety to be
destroyed in accordance with the department's procedures; or
(3) Transfers or sells the large-capacity ammunition feeding device to a federally
licensed firearm dealer outside the State that is lawfully entitled to own or possess
such a device;
B. An active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National
Guard who is authorized to possess and carry a large-capacity ammunition feeding
device;
C. An employed federal or state law enforcement officer who, whether on or off duty,
is authorized to possess and carry a large-capacity ammunition feeding device;
D. A large-capacity ammunition feeding device that is manufactured or sold solely for
use with a firearm that is determined to be a curio or relic, or antique, as those terms
are defined in 27 Code of Federal Regulations, Section 478.11; or
E. A federally licensed firearm dealer temporarily transporting a large-capacity
ammunition feeding device through the State to be sold or transferred to a person
outside of the State.
Page 1 - 132LR2138(01)